Maryland, session 2025, SB0827.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
9–614.1.
(a) In this section, “restrictive housing” has the meaning stated in § 9–614 of this
subtitle.
(b) This section applies to a facility operated by a correctional unit, as defined in
§ 2–401 of this article.
(c) A MINOR MAY NOT BE PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING SOLELY FOR
THE PURPOSES OF DISCIPLINE, PUNISHMENT, ADMINISTRATIVE CONVENIENCE,
RETALIATION, OR STAFFING SHORTAGES.
(D) (1) A minor may [not] be placed in restrictive housing [unless] AS A
TEMPORARY MEASURE IF:
(I) the managing official of the facility finds by clear and convincing
evidence that there is an immediate and substantial risk:
[(1)] 1. of physical harm to the minor, other incarcerated
individuals, or staff; or
[(2)] 2. to the security of the facility;
(II) THERE ARE NO OTHER REASONABLE MEANS TO ELIMINATE
THE RISK;
(III) RESTRICTIVE HOUSING IS USED ONLY TO THE EXTENT
NECESSARY TO ELIMINATE THE IDENTIFIED RISK;
(IV) RESTRICTIVE HOUSING OCCURS UNDER THE LEAST
RESTRICTIVE CONDITIONS PRACTICABLE AND CONSISTENT WITH THE RATIONALE
FOR THE MINOR’S PLACEMENT IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING;
(V) FACILITY STAFF PROMPTLY NOTIFIES THE MINOR OF THE
RATIONALE FOR THE MINOR’S PLACEMENT IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING; AND
(VI) FACILITY STAFF DEVELOPS A PLAN THAT WILL ALLOW THE
MINOR TO LEAVE RESTRICTIVE HOUSING AND RETURN TO THE GENERAL
POPULATION AS SOON AS POSSIBLE.

SENATE BILL 827 3
(2) (I) A HEALTH CARE OR MENTAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER
SHALL CONDUCT A MENTAL HEALTH SCREENING OF A MINOR PLACED IN
RESTRICTIVE HOUSING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 1 HOUR OF THE MINOR’S
PLACEMENT.
(II) FOLLOWING THE MENTAL HEALTH SCREENING CONDUCTED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
SHALL PROVIDE THE MINOR WITH ANY NECESSARY MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES.
(3) A MINOR PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE HOUSED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING FOR THE SHORTEST
AMOUNT OF TIME NECESSARY, NOT TO EXCEED 6 HOURS.
(4) AT THE END OF THE TIME PERIOD DESCRIBED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY SHALL:
(I) RETURN THE MINOR TO THE GENERAL POPULATION;
(II) TRANSPORT THE MINOR TO A MENTAL HEALTH FACILITY IF
RECOMMENDED BY A MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL;
(III) TRANSFER THE MINOR TO THE MEDICAL UNIT IN THE
FACILITY; OR
(IV) PROVIDE SPECIAL INDIVIDUALIZED PROGRAMMING
OUTSIDE OF RESTRICTIVE HOUSING THAT MAY INCLUDE:
1. IN–PERSON SUPERVISION BY AND INTERACTION WITH
STAFF MEMBERS;
2. IN–PERSON PROVISION OF EDUCATIONAL SERVICES;
3. INVOLVEMENT OF THE MINOR IN OTHER ASPECTS OF
THE FACILITY’S PROGRAMMING, UNLESS THE INVOLVEMENT THREATENS THE
SAFETY OF THE MINOR OR STAFF OR THE SECURITY OF THE FACILITY;
4. DEVELOPMENT OF AN INDIVIDUALIZED PLAN TO
IMPROVE THE MINOR’S BEHAVIOR, CREATED IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MINOR,
MENTAL HEALTH CARE OR HEALTH CARE STAFF, AND THE MINOR’S FAMILY
MEMBERS, THAT IDENTIFIES THE CAUSES AND PURPOSES OF THE NEGATIVE
BEHAVIOR AND ESTABLISHES CONCRETE GOALS THAT THE MINOR CAN WORK
TOWARD IN ORDER TO BE REMOVED FROM SPECIAL PROGRAMMING; AND

SENATE BILL 827
5. DAILY REVIEW WITH THE MINOR OF THE MINOR’S
PROGRESS TOWARD GOALS OUTLINED IN THE INDIVIDUALIZED PLAN.
(E) (1) A MINOR MAY BE PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING AT THE
MINOR’S REQUEST.
(2) A MINOR PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION MAY REVOKE A REQUEST TO BE PLACED IN RESTRICTIVE HOUSING AT
ANY TIME AND, IF REVOKED, THE MINOR SHALL BE IMMEDIATELY RETURNED TO THE
GENERAL POPULATION.
[(d)] (F) A minor placed in restrictive housing shall be provided:
(1) [daily physical and mental health assessments to determine whether
the minor may be released from restrictive housing;
(2)] the same standard of access that is provided to incarcerated individuals
not in restrictive housing to:
(i) phone calls;
(ii) visits;
(iii) mail;
(iv) food;
(v) water;
(vi) showers;
(vii) sanitary supplies;
(viii) property, including clothing and bedding; and
(ix) medical, mental, and dental health care; and
[(3)] (2) unless it would pose a risk of physical harm to the minor or
another, maximized access to recreation, education, and programming.
[(e)] (G) If a privilege or condition described in subsection [(d)] (F) of this section
is not provided to the minor, the managing official or the managing official’s designee shall
record the reason in the minor’s file.
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings

SENATE BILL 827 5
3–8A–16.
[(a) The official in charge of a jail or other facility for the detention of adult
offenders or persons charged with crime shall inform the court or the intake officer
immediately when a person, who is or appears to be under the age of 18 years, is received
at the facility and shall deliver him to the court upon request or transfer him to the facility
designated by the intake officer or the court, unless the court has waived its jurisdiction
with respect to the person and he is being proceeded against as an adult.
(b) When a case is transferred to another court for criminal prosecution, the child
shall promptly be transferred to the appropriate officer or adult detention facility in
accordance with the law governing the detention of persons charged with crime.]
(A) A CHILD, INCLUDING ONE SUBJECT TO ADULT CRIMINAL COURT
JURISDICTION, WHO HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF A CRIME OR IS AWAITING TRIAL ON
CRIMINAL CHARGES, MAY NOT BE DETAINED OR CONFINED IN ANY INSTITUTION IN
WHICH THE CHILD HAS CONTACT WITH OR COMES WITHIN SIGHT OR SOUND OF AN
INCARCERATED ADULT.
(B) A CHILD WHO HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF OR IS AWAITING TRIAL FOR AN
OFFENSE UNDER ADULT JURISDICTION MAY NOT BE HELD IN CUSTODY IN AN ADULT
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE SENTENCING COURT AND
THE STATE’S ATTORNEY WITHIN 180 DAYS, OR AS SOON AS OTHERWISE
PRACTICABLE, BEFORE A CHILD WHO IS IN THE CUSTODY OF THE DEPARTMENT
REACHES 18 YEARS OF AGE.
(2) ON THE SENTENCING COURT’S RECEIPT OF A NOTIFICATION
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SENTENCING COURT SHALL SET
THE MATTER FOR A HEARING BEFORE THE CHILD REACHES 18 YEARS OF AGE AND
SHALL ENTER AN ORDER TRANSFERRING THE CHILD, ON THE CHILD REACHING 18
YEARS OF AGE, TO AN ADULT CORRECTIONAL FACILITY, FACILITY FOR YOUTHFUL
OFFENDERS, IF APPLICABLE, OR ANY DISPOSITION THE COURT CONSIDERS
APPROPRIATE THAT DOES NOT VIOLATE THIS SECTION.
(3) THE SENTENCING COURT MAY NOT REMAND A PERSON WHO HAS
REACHED 18 YEARS OF AGE TO A JUVENILE FACILITY OR PLACE THE PERSON WITH
OTHER JUVENILES.
[(c)] (D) A child may not be transported together with adults who have been
charged with or convicted of a crime [unless the court has waived its jurisdiction and the
child is being proceeded against as an adult].

SENATE BILL 827
Article – Criminal Procedure
4–202.
(h) [(1)] Pending a determination under this section to transfer its jurisdiction,
the court shall order the child to be held in a secure juvenile facility unless[:
(i)] the child is released on bail, recognizance, or other conditions of
pretrial release[;
(ii) there is not available capacity in a secure juvenile facility, as
determined by the Department of Juvenile Services; or
(iii) the court finds that detention in a secure juvenile facility would
pose a risk of harm to the child or others.
(2) If the court makes a finding under paragraph (1)(iii) of this subsection
that detention in a secure juvenile facility would pose a risk of harm to the child or others,
the court shall state the reasons for the finding on the record].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.